apertium-sme-smj.smj.twol
"oa:å Diphtong Simplification Part I"
 o:0 <=> [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12  [ a: | i: ] (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; !1 WeG of a- and i-stems
         [ 0 | [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 e: (%>:) (»:) Q1: ( X5: ) j ; !2 ComSg & G-C Pl of e-stems
!        [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) j ; !3 ComSg & G-C Pl of Actor nouns from a-verbs, G1
!        [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 e: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) j ; !4 ComSg & G-C Pl of Actor nouns from e-verbs, G1
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 e: (%>:) (»:) Y1: ; !5 Different verb forms
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 o: (%>:) (»:) X4: j ; !6 Ill
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 o: (Cns:*) (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | X7: | X4: (X8:) | [Q1:|Q4:] X4: X8: ] ; !7 Long pass, Dim and Prs Sg3 etc. Px
!        [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 o: (Cns:*) (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | Y7: | Y9: | X7: ] ; !7 Long pass, Dim and Prs Sg3 etc.
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 o: Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ; !8 odd-syll, oblique
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 a [g8:|l9:|s] (%>:) (»:) X3: (X1:) [ (Hyph) [ # | #: ] | n ] ; !9 NE låvda
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 e: (%>:) (»:) Q1:0 t: j [ [ # | #: ] | [Vow:[v|n|h|b|p|[ # | #: ]]]]; !10 Potensialis doadjet:dåjitjav
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 e: (%>:) (»:) Q4: ( X5: ) j ; !11 ComSg & G-C Pl of e-stems
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: LowerG12 o:u (%>:) (»:) [ Q1: | Q4: ] X5: j n ([a:|i:]) ; !12Px Com
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: G32 o:u (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: G32 e:i (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ a: G32 [ a: | i: ] (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;



"oa:å Diphtong Simplification Part II"
 a:å <=> [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12  [ a: | i: ] (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;       !1 WeG of a- and i-stems
         [ 0 | [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 e: (%>:) (»:) Q1: ( X5: ) j ;       !2 ComSg & G-C Pl of e-stems
!        [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) j ;       !3 ComSg & G-C Pl of Actor nouns from a-verbs, G1
!        [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 e: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) j ;       !4 ComSg & G-C Pl of Actor nouns from e-verbs, G1
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 e: (%>:) (»:) Y1: ;       !5 Different verb forms
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 o: (%>:) (»:) X4: j ; !6 Ill
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 o: (Cns:*) (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | X7: | X4: (X8:) | [Q1:|Q4:] X4: X8: ] ; !7 Long pass and Prs Sg3 etc.  Px
!        [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 o: (Cns:*) (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | Y7: | Y9: | X7: ] ; !7 Long pass and Prs Sg3 etc.
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 o: Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;       !8 odd-syll, oblique
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 a [g8:|l9:|s] (%>:) (»:) X3: (X1:) [ (Hyph) [ # | #: ] | n ] ;       !9 NE låvda
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 e: (%>:) (»:) Q1:0 t: j [ [ # | #: ] | [Vow:[v|n|h|b|p|[ # | #: ]]]]; !10 Potensialis doadjet:dåjitjav
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 e: (%>:) (»:) Q4: ( X5: ) j ;       !11 ComSg & G-C Pl of e-stems.
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ LowerG12 o:u (%>:) (»:) [ Q1: | Q4: ] X5: j n ([a:|i:]) ; !12Px Com
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ G32 o:u (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; !  X2 X3 X7 Y5 Q1 Q2 Q3
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ G32 e:i (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] o: _ G32 [ a: | i: ] (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;



!€ toahkkeY6X5jn
!€ toahkki00jn

!$ toahkkeY6X5jn
!$ t0åhkki00jn

!€ boalloX4j
!€ b0ållu0j

! BUG 193:
!€ roavggoX4j
!€ roavggu0j
!$ roavggoX4j
!$ r0åvggu0j

! G3:G2, fake ex
! Here, G2 allows diphtsimpl
!€ toas'soQ1X5jn
!€ t0ås0su00jn

! And vice versa
!$ toas'soQ1X5jn
!$ toas0su00jn

! G3:G3, lexical ex, no CG
! will have to have a different lexicon in noun-smj-lex,
! not pointing to Q1. Cf. GOAHTI/STAHTA sme.
!$ moas'soX5jn
!$ m0ås0su0jn

!€ moas'soX5jn
!€ moas0su0jn

! The next example shows actor noun in G3 (actor nouns are always G3)
!€ goar'roY6X5jn
!€ goar0ru00jn
! This test should hit, but fails, since G3 looks like G2 at the lower level.
! Further clever thinking is needed here.

! this is G2 > G3. Derived G3 from a G2 stem (actor noun)
!€ goarroY6X5jn
!€ goarru00jn
! This example should be like this (no diphsimpl), but at present our analysator gives diphtsimpl
! as it is G2. Whe have two possibilities:
! a. find a way of saying that it is G3 (impossible, I think)
! b. block the diphtsimpl not based upon (invisible) G3, but upon its triggering context.

! The next example shows errouneous dipht simpl for G3.
!$ goar'roY6X5jn
!$ g0år0ru00jn

! Here, G3 blocks diph simpl
!$ goar'roY2
!$ g0år0ru0

! The following example shows correct  diphtong simplification in G2 (3Sg pres)
!€ goarroY2
!€ g0årru0

!€ doa0djeY6
!€ doaddje0

!$ doa0djeY6
!$ d0åddje0

!G3 > G2
!€ goar'roY5d9it
!€ g0år0ru0dit

!$ goar'roY5d9it
!$ goar0ru0dit

! The following tests are using fictive, non-existent verbs, to test the correctnes of the mapping rules in twolc
! the verbs are *toabmot, oadot, etc.
! X4 for o:u in illsg, pres. part

!€ toa0bmoY6X4j
!€ toabbmu00j

!€ toabmoX4j
!€ t0åbmu0j

!$ toa0bmoY6X4j
!$ t0åbbmu00j

!€ toabmoX7dallat
!€ t0å0mu0dallat
!$ toabmoX7dallat
!$ toa0mu0dallat

!€ oaddoY6X4j
!€ oaddu00j

!€ boassjkoQ1X5jn
!€ b0å0sjku00jn

!$ boassjkoQ1X5jn
!$ boas0jku00jn

!€ boajsstoQ1X5jn
!€ b0åj0stu00jn

!$ boajsstoQ1X5jn
!$ boaj0stu00jn

!€ boaggoQ1X5jn
!€ b0åkku00jn

!$ boaggoQ1X5jn
!$ boakku00jn



! All real sámi æ's are also ä's, but not in these contexts, where other rules will take over.
!"æ:ä Blocking"
! æ:ä /<= _ Cns:+ [ o: (%>:) (»:)                                            X4:                            j              |
!                   o:    (Cns:*) (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | X7: | X4: (X8:) | [Q1:|Q4:] X4: X8:]          |
!                   o:     Cns:+ (%>:) (»:)                                  X5:                                           |
!                   a:     (%>:) (»:) WeG:                                                                                 |
!                   o:u   (%>:) (»:) (WeG:)                                             ([Q1:|Q4:] X5:      j n ([a:|i:])) |
!                   Vow:0 (%>:) (»:)                                                                   X9:                 ] ;
! Rationale:
! Stop change to ä in all Real Sámi contexts. The idea is to keep Swedish Snälla from becoming 
! The rule blocks change from Norwegian æ to Swedish ä, thus a more relevant example would be: Hægsæt - it should not become Hägsät


!€mæddoQ1jn
!€mätto0jn

!$mæddoQ1X5jn
!$mättu00jn

!€mæddoX4j
!€mäddu0j

!$Hægsæt
!$Hägsät

!$Hærland
!$Härland


! æ:e diphthong simplificaton


"æ:e Diphthong Simplification 1"
 æ:e <=  [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 o: (%>:) (»:) X4: j ; !6 Ill
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 o: (Cns:*) (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | X7: | X4: (X8:) | [Q1:|Q4:] X4: X8:] ; !7 Long pass, Dim and Prs Sg3 etc. !Px Nom, acc, gen
!        [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 o: (Cns:*) (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | Y7: | Y9: | X7: ] ; !7 Long pass, Dim and Prs Sg3 etc.
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 o: Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ; !8 odd-syll, oblique
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 a: (%>:) (»:) ; !  WeG of a-stems !Errouneously gives vællahit:vellahit
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 o:u (%>:) (»:) [ Q1: | Q4: ] X5: j n ([a:|i:]) ; !Px Com
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ G32      o:u (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%^:) | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ G32      a: (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;

"æ:e Diphthong Simplification 2"
 æ:e  => [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 o: (%>:) (»:) X4: j ; !6 Ill
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 o: (Cns:*) (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | X7: | X4: (X8:) | [Q1:|Q4:] X4: X8:] ; !7 Long pass, Dim and Prs Sg3 etc. !Px Nom, acc, gen
!        [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 o: (Cns:*) (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | Y7: | Y9: | X7: ] ; !7 Long pass, Dim and Prs Sg3 etc.
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 o: Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ; !8 odd-syll, oblique
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 a: (%>:) (»:) ; !  WeG of a-stems
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ LowerG12 o:u (%>:) (»:) [Q1:|Q4:] X5: j n ([a:|i:]) ; !Px Com
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ G32      o:u (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; !  X2 X3 X7 Y5 Q1 Q2 Q3
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%^:) | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ G32      a:  (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;



"ie:æ Diphthong Simplification Part I"
 i:0 <=> [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ e: Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) X4: ;     !1
     	 [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ e: Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) [ Q2: | Y2: | Y3: ] ;     !2 Prs Sg of e-stem verbs
     	 [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ e: Cns:* e: Cns: (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ; !3 odd-syll, oblique
                                _ e: (Cns) Cns:+ e:á (Cns:+) (%>:) (»:) [X5:|Y2:|Q2:|Y3:|X7:|Y4:|X4:(X5:|Q1:)|Y6: X4:|Y7:|[Q1:|Q4:] X4: (X4:) X8:]  ; ! Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation
                                _ e: (Cns) Cns:+ i:á (%>:) (»:) Y5: Cns:+ ;     !Der/r
                                _ e: [[:d|:b|:g] [d|b|g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h :Cns Cns:+] e:0 (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y9: ] u ; !ielvvet:ælvvu, ielvvet:ælvvup short passive, ImprtII
                                _ e: Cns:+ e:0 (%>:) (»:) Y8: o ; !ielvvet:ælvvop, Imprt
                                _ e: Cns:+ e:0 (%>:) (»:) Q8: u ; !giesset:gessus, ImprtII


!€ ielvveY9ut
!€ 0ælvv00ut

!€ iehttseY1up
!€ 0æhtts00up

!€ giesseQ8us
!€ g0ess00us
